Washington statutes.
RCW 15.14.085

Acquisition of property—Use of property.

The director may acquire by gift, grant, or endowment from public or private sources, as may be made in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of this chapter, real property and any other type property, and expend the same or any income therefrom according to the terms of the gift, grant, or endowment.

[ 1999 c 144 s 9; 1961 c 83 s 4. Formerly RCW 15.14.040.]